Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11A-102] Applicability. This
article shall apply to insurers either domiciled in this State or domiciled in
a state that is not an accredited state having in effect a substantially
similar law. All provisions of article 11, to the extent they are not in
conflict with this article, shall apply to all parties within a holding company
system subject to this article. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next